Louisiana, session 2026, HB1112.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:11(B), 24.8(A), (B), and (D)(1), 407.33(1) and (5), 407.35(A),
and 407.41(A), (B)(2) and (3), and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
17:407.41(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§11. Approval of nonpublic schools by board
* * *
B.(1) The board shall approve any nonpublic elementary or secondary school
which makes application therefor on a form furnished by the board, if such school
Page 1 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2610 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1112
meets and maintains a sustained curriculum or specialized course of study of quality
at least equal to that prescribed for similar public schools.
(2) The board shall approve a prekindergarten program established by a
nonpublic school as provided in R.S. 17:24.8 if the program meets the requirements
of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
* * *
§24.8. Prekindergarten programs
A.(1) Each city, parish, or other local public school board may develop and
offer prekindergarten instruction. The youngest age at which a child may enter
prekindergarten provided for by this Subsection Paragraph shall be four years old by
September thirtieth of the year in which the child enrolls in prekindergarten.
(2) All public prekindergarten programs shall comply with the child safety
and welfare minimum standards provided for in R.S. 17:407.41. The governing
authority of any approved nonpublic elementary school may develop and offer
prekindergarten instruction. The youngest age at which a child may enter such a
prekindergarten program is three years old by September thirtieth of the year in
which the child enrolls in prekindergarten.
(3) Any parent or legal guardian who chooses to enroll his child in a
prekindergarten program as provided in this Subsection shall be provided the
following information:
(a) The prekindergarten program is operated by a school.
(b) The prekindergarten is not subject to federal daycare regulations pursuant
to 45 CFR 98 or its successor or licensed by the department as an early learning
center as provided in R.S. 17:407.31 et seq.
B.(1) The governing authority of any approved nonpublic elementary school
may develop and offer prekindergarten instruction. The youngest age at which a
child may enter prekindergarten provided for by this Subsection shall be three years
old by September thirtieth of the year in which the child enrolls in prekindergarten.
All school prekindergarten programs, except for programs operated by nonpublic
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2610 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1112
schools approved by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education as
provided in R.S. 17:11, shall comply with the child safety and welfare standards
provided for in R.S. 17:407.41.
(2)(a) All nonpublic prekindergarten programs shall be licensed as an early
learning center pursuant to Part X-B of this Chapter. For a public prekindergarten
program with persistent or egregious noncompliance with such standards, a city,
parish, or other local public school board shall at a public meeting consider closure
of the program or other measures deemed necessary to protect the safety and welfare
of children enrolled in the program.
(b) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education may revoke its
approval of a nonpublic school at any time if the board determines that the school
has jeopardized the health, safety, or welfare of its students.
* * *
D.(1) Beginning with the 2023-2024 school year, each city, parish, or other
local public school board shall work to develop a mixed provider delivery model for
full-day, year-round, high-quality prekindergarten instruction to each child residing
within the boundaries of the school district who is eligible for a prekindergarten
program pursuant to Subsection A Paragraph (A)(1) of this Section.
* * *
§407.33. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Camp" means any place or facility operated by any institution, society,
agency, corporation, person or persons, or any other group which meets any of the
following criteria:
(a) It serves only children five three years of age or older and operates only
when school is not in session during the summer months or school holidays
including but not limited to a Vacation Bible School or Bible Camp.
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2610 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1112
(b) It is a tax-exempt church or religious organization in accordance with
Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code that operates a vacation Bible school,
Bible camp, or religious camp for children of any age.
(c) It operates an after-school or weekend extracurricular, academic, or
athletic program, including any competition related to the program, or an after-
school or weekend tutoring program or other educational or enrichment program
authorized by this Title.
* * *
(5) "Early learning center" means any child day care center, Early Head Start
Center, Head Start Center, or nonpublic standalone prekindergarten program not
attached to a school.
* * *
§407.35. Exemptions from licensure requirements
A. The provisions of this Part shall not apply to grades kindergarten and
above, prekindergarten programs attached to a public or nonpublic day school
serving children in grades kindergarten and above, Louisiana Montessori accredited
or provisionally accredited approved schools, camps, registered family child day care
homes, mother's day out programs, and care given without charge. However, all
school prekindergarten programs, except for programs operated by nonpublic schools
approved by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education as provided in
R.S. 17:11, shall comply with the child safety and welfare minimum standards
provided for in R.S. 17:407.41.
* * *
§407.41. Child safety and welfare minimum standards
A. In addition to regulations promulgated by the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education pursuant to R.S. 17:407.40, all early learning centers and
All school prekindergarten programs established pursuant to R.S. 17:24.8 shall, at
a minimum, meet the following minimum standards to ensure the safety and welfare
of children except as otherwise provided in this Section:
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2610 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1112
(1) There shall be a minimum of two staff members present at any facility
when more than four children are present, except under an extenuating circumstance
that temporarily prevents compliance with this Paragraph.
(2)(a) The Through the end of the 2026-2027 school year, the child-to-staff
ratios shall not exceed the following:
(a) Infants and under one year - 5 to 1
(b) One year - 7 to 1
(c) Two years - 10 to 1
(d) (i) Three years or children enrolled in a school prekindergarten program
for three-year-olds - 13 to 1.
(e) (ii) Four years or children enrolled in a school prekindergarten program
for four-year-olds - 15 20 to 1.
(f) (iii) Five years or children enrolled in a school prekindergarten program
for five-year-olds- 19 20 to 1.
(b) Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, child-to-staff ratios shall not
exceed the following:
(i) Three years or children enrolled in a school prekindergarten program for
three-year-olds - 13 to 1.
(ii) Four years or children enrolled in a school prekindergarten program for
four-year-olds - 15 to 1.
(iii) Five years or children enrolled in a school prekindergarten program for
five-year-olds - 20 to 1.
(3) An average of the child-to-staff ratios may be applied to mixed age
groups of children only for groups that include no children under the age of two.
(4) When a mixed age group includes children younger than age two, the age
of the youngest child determines the child-to-staff ratio for the group.
(5) When the nature of a child with special healthcare needs or the number
of children with special healthcare needs warrants added care, the center shall add
sufficient staff as necessary.
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2610 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1112
(6) Only staff members directly providing care, supervision, or guidance to
children shall be counted in the child-to-staff ratio. The Except for transitions
between activities or classrooms, the same staff members shall not be used to meet
the ratio requirements for two different groups of children at the same time.
(7) (5) Sufficient staffing needed to satisfy child-to-staff ratios shall be
present on the premises during rest time and available to assist as needed. Children
ages one and older may be grouped together at rest time with one staff member in
each room supervising the resting children.
(8) (6) Information regarding required child-to-staff ratios and a phone
number to file complaints regarding supervision with the Department of Education
shall be posted in each public school classroom in a location that is visible to parents
and legal guardians.
(9) (7) Children shall be supervised at all times including on the playground,
on field trips, and on nonvehicular excursions.
(10)(a) (8)(a) Children shall not be left alone in any room, outdoors, or in
vehicles, even momentarily, without staff present.
(b) The provisions of this Paragraph shall not apply to restroom use as
provided in this Section, if a child is being provided services by therapeutic
professionals, or if a child is in the custody of a parent or legal guardian.
(11) (9) A staff person shall be assigned to supervise specific children whose
names and whereabouts that the staff person shall know and with whom the staff
person shall be physically present. Staff shall be able to state how many children are
in their care at all times.
(12)(a) (10)(a) A child who is developmentally able may be permitted to use
the restroom independently if a staff member is in proximity to and can see the child
to ensure immediate intervention to safeguard a child from harm or to assist with an
accident while in the restroom.
(b) An individual who is not a staff member may not enter the restroom area
while in use by any child other than his own child.
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2610 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1112
(13) (11) A child age five and older may be permitted to go to and return
from the restroom without staff.
(14) (12) If a prekindergarten program or early learning center is part of a
school with children in kindergarten or older, staff shall ensure that the children
enrolled in the prekindergarten program or early learning center are not unsupervised
in the restroom at the same time as any older children who are using the restroom.
For any facility constructed after January 1, 2026, there shall be designated separate
restrooms for the children enrolled in the prekindergarten program or early learning
center.
(15) (13) Children shall be changed and cleaned immediately following a
toileting accident.
B.
* * *
(2) The state Department of Education shall provide the document to each
early learning center and school prekindergarten program no later than August first
of each year.
(3) Each early learning center and public school with a prekindergarten
program shall distribute the document to the parents and legal guardians of all
children enrolled in an early learning center or prekindergarten the program.
* * *
C. The state Department of Education shall provide written notification to:
the
(1) The superintendent of a school district for any complaint received by the
department regarding a prekindergarten program in the district pursuant to this
Section.
(2) The governing authority of a charter school or a nonpublic school for any
complaint received by the department regarding a prekindergarten program at the
school pursuant to this Section.
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2610 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1112
D. Prekindergarten programs operated by nonpublic schools approved by the
State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education as provided in R.S. 17:11 are
exempt from the provisions of Subsections A through C of this Section.
Section 2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education may adopt emergency rules in accordance of the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of Section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.